South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5744.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 4-10-330(A)(1) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (j) operations for emergency services including, but not limited to, police, fire, and emergency medical technician services; SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----